Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.07.370

Debt limitation.

Bonds issued by the authority under this chapter shall not be subject to the debt limitation set forth in RCW 28B.07.050(9).

[ 2007 c 36 s 11.]

NOTES:

Policy—Purpose—2007 c 36: See note following RCW 28B.07.300.